District of Columbia statutes.
16-1158

Persons holding over after life estate; damages.

A guardian or trustee for an infant, or other person having an estate determinable upon life or lives, who, after the determination of the particular estate or interest, without the express consent of the person or persons who is or are next and immediately entitled thereto, holds over and continues in possession of the real property, is a trespasser. Any person entitled to the real property upon or after the determination of the particular estate or interest, or his executor or administrator, may recover in damages against the person so holding over, or his executor or administrator, the full value of the profits received during the wrongful possession.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Cross References

Building lines, condemnation proceedings, application of law, see § 6-403.
Garbage, disposal sites, authorization to acquire by condemnation, see § 8-705.
Motor vehicle parking, property acquisition, see § 50-2603.
National Capital Housing Authority, powers and duties, condemnation proceedings, see § 6-101.02 Streets and alleys, closing procedures, in rem proceedings by Mayor, see § 9-202.11.
Streets and alleys, means for acquiring land, see § 9-203.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1158.
1973 Ed., § 16-1158.